Indiana, session 2026, HB1113.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-5-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. This section applies to a written rental
agreement between a landlord and tenant entered into after June
30, 2026. The written rental agreement shall include a provision
that in the event that the landlord fails to replace or repair an item
necessary to comply with IC 32-31-8-5(c)(2), IC 32-31-8-5(c)(4), or
IC 32-31-8-5(d) within seven (7) days after receiving notice of the
deficiency, the tenant has the right to be reimbursed for any
deposits placed on the dwelling unit and terminate the rental
agreement.
SECTION 2. IC 32-31-8-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this
section, "essential item" means an item, or one (1) or more parts
or components of an item, that:
(1) is described in subsection (c)(4); and
(2) is:
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


(A) used for; or
(B) necessary to;
the delivery of one (1) or more essential services to a rental
unit.
(b) As used in this section, "essential service" means:
(1) electricity;
(2) gas;
(3) heat;
(4) water; or
(5) another service;
needed for the safe and habitable occupation by a tenant of the
tenant's rental unit.
(c) A landlord shall do the following:
(1) Deliver the rental premises to a tenant in compliance with the
rental agreement, and in a safe, clean, and habitable condition.
(2) Comply with all health and housing codes applicable to the
rental premises.
(3) Make all reasonable efforts to keep common areas of a rental
premises in a clean and proper condition.
(4) Provide and maintain the following items in a rental premises
in good and safe working condition, if provided on the premises
at the time the rental agreement is entered into:
(A) Electrical systems.
(B) Plumbing systems sufficient to accommodate a reasonable
supply of hot and cold running water at all times.
(C) Sanitary systems.
(D) Heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems. A
heating system must be sufficient to adequately supply heat at
all times.
(E) Elevators, if provided.
(F) Appliances supplied as an inducement to the rental
agreement.
(d) Subject to subsections (e) and (f), a landlord shall repair or
replace an essential item not later than twenty-four (24) hours
after being notified by a tenant that the rental unit is without one
(1) or more essential services as a result of:
(1) a malfunction in the essential item; or
(2) the landlord's failure to otherwise maintain the essential
item in good and safe working condition.
(e) The twenty-four (24) hour period set forth in subsection (d)
does not apply if:
(1) the malfunction is the direct result of the tenant's
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


commission of waste to the essential item or the rental unit; or
(2) the landlord makes a good faith attempt within the
twenty-four (24) hour period to repair or replace an essential
item through:
(A) the landlord's own efforts; or
(B) the services of:
(i) a contractor; or
(ii) an employee or agent of the landlord;
and the landlord or person described in clause (B) is unable to
begin or complete the needed repairs or replacement within
the twenty-four (24) hour period.
(f) Subsection (d) does not:
(1) prohibit a landlord from interrupting, shutting off, or
terminating one (1) or more essential services to a rental unit
as needed:
(A) in an emergency;
(B) to make good faith repairs; or
(C) for construction; or
(2) require a landlord to pay for one (1) or more essential
services provided to a rental unit if the landlord has not
agreed to pay for the essential services under the rental
agreement.
SECTION 3. IC 32-31-8-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. Instead of, or prior to, bringing an action under
section 6 of this chapter, a tenant may enforce an obligation of a
landlord under this chapter by doing one (1) of the following:
(1) Requesting an enforcement authority (as defined in
IC 36-7-9-2) to make repairs to an essential item defined in
section 5(a) of this chapter in accordance with IC 36-7-9-5.5.
(2) Terminating a rental agreement in accordance with
IC 32-31-5-8.
SECTION 4. IC 32-31-8-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) This section applies to an action filed under
section 6 of this chapter, after June 30, 2026.
(b) During the pendency of an action, if a tenant continues to
occupy the rental unit upon which the action is based, the court
may issue a provisional order that the tenant make the regular
rental payments due under the rental agreement to:
(1) the clerk of the court, who shall hold the payments in a
trust; or
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


(2) an attorney trust account.
The funds held under this subsection may not be disbursed without
a court order.
(c) If a tenant is the prevailing party, the tenant is entitled to a
refund of rental payments made under subsection (b). The court
shall determine the amount of the refund by considering:
(1) the estimated cost of repairs or other action necessary to
remedy the condition that was the basis of the tenant's action;
(2) expenses incurred by the tenant to remedy the condition
that was the basis of the tenant's action;
(3) efforts by the landlord before and after the filing of the
tenant's action to remedy the condition that was the basis of
the tenant's action; and
(4) any other factors that justice may require.
The court may reduce the amount of funds to be awarded to the
tenant if the court determines that the tenant contributed to the
condition of noncompliance that formed the basis of the action.
(d) If a landlord is the prevailing party:
(1) the landlord is entitled to receive the rental payments
made under subsection (b) to be credited against the amount
of the regular rental payments due by the tenant under the
parties' rental agreement; and
(2) the court may reduce the amount of funds to be awarded
to the landlord if the court determines that the landlord's
failure to comply with one (1) or more requirements under
this chapter contributed to the condition of noncompliance
that formed the basis of the action.
(e) The court shall issue an order directing the disbursement of
funds under either subsection (c) or (d).
SECTION 5. IC 36-7-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.247-2015,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The enforcement authority may issue an
order requiring action relative to any unsafe premises, including:
(1) vacating of an unsafe building;
(2) sealing an unsafe building against intrusion by unauthorized
persons, in accordance with a uniform standard established by
ordinance;
(3) extermination of vermin in and about the unsafe premises;
(4) removal of trash, debris, fire hazardous material, or a public
health hazard in and about the unsafe premises;
(5) repair or rehabilitation of an unsafe building to bring it into
compliance with standards for building condition or maintenance
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


required for human habitation, occupancy, or use by a statute, a
rule adopted under IC 4-22-2, or an ordinance;
(6) demolition and removal of part of an unsafe building;
(7) demolition and removal of an unsafe building if:
(A) the general condition of the building warrants removal; or
(B) the building continues to require reinspection and
additional abatement action after an initial abatement action
was taken pursuant to notice and an order; and
(8) requiring, for an unsafe building that will be sealed for a
period of more than ninety (90) days:
(A) sealing against intrusion by unauthorized persons and the
effects of weather;
(B) exterior improvements to make the building compatible in
appearance with other buildings in the area; and
(C) continuing maintenance and upkeep of the building and
premises;
in accordance with standards established by ordinance; and
(9) providing for the replacement or repair of an essential
item (as defined in IC 32-31-8-5(a)) and assessing costs and a
civil penalty in accordance with section 5.5 of this chapter.
Notice of the order must be given under section 25 of this chapter. The
ordered action must be reasonably related to the condition of the unsafe
premises and the nature and use of nearby properties. The order
supersedes any permit relating to building or land use, whether that
permit is obtained before or after the order is issued.
(b) The order must contain the following:
(1) The name of the person to whom the order is issued.
(2) The legal description or address of the unsafe premises that
are the subject of the order.
(3) The action that the order requires.
(4) The period of time in which the action is required to be
accomplished, measured from the time when the notice of the
order is given.
(5) If a hearing is required, a statement indicating the exact time
and place of the hearing, and stating that person to whom the
order was issued is entitled to appear at the hearing with or
without legal counsel, present evidence, cross-examine opposing
witnesses, and present arguments.
(6) If a hearing is not required, a statement that an order under
subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), or (a)(5), or (a)(9) becomes final
ten (10) days after notice is given, unless a hearing is requested
in writing by a person holding a fee interest, life estate interest, or
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


equitable interest of a contract purchaser in the unsafe premises,
and the request is delivered to the enforcement authority before
the end of the ten (10) day period.
(7) A statement briefly indicating what action can be taken by the
enforcement authority if the order is not complied with.
(8) A statement indicating the obligation created by section 27 of
this chapter relating to notification of subsequent interest holders
and the enforcement authority.
(9) The name, address, and telephone number of the enforcement
authority.
(10) A statement that the hearing authority may determine the
property to be abandoned as provided in IC 36-7-37.
(c) Except as provided by section 5.5 of this chapter, the order
must allow a sufficient time, of at least ten (10) days, but not more than
sixty (60) days, from the time when notice of the order is given, to
accomplish the required action. If the order allows more than thirty
(30) days to accomplish the action, the order may require that a
substantial beginning be made in accomplishing the action within thirty
(30) days.
(d) The order expires two (2) years from the day the notice of the
order is given, unless one (1) or more of the following events occurs
within that two (2) year period:
(1) A complaint requesting judicial review is filed under section
8 of this chapter.
(2) A contract for action required by the order is let at public bid
under section 11 of this chapter.
(3) A civil action is filed under section 17 of this chapter.
(e) If the order contains a statement under subsection (a)(6) or
(a)(7), notice of the order shall be given to each person with a known
or recorded substantial property interest.
SECTION 6. IC 36-7-9-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) If a tenant reports that a landlord has not
repaired an essential item (as defined in IC 32-31-8-5(a)) within
twenty-four (24) hours, the tenant may submit a request, in a
manner prescribed by the enforcement authority, not later than
forty-eight (48) hours after the expiration of the twenty-four (24)
hour time frame described in IC 32-31-8-5(d). If the enforcement
authority receives a request from a tenant under this section, the
enforcement authority shall inspect the premises not later than
twenty-four (24) hours after the receipt of the request. If the
enforcement authority determines that a landlord has not complied
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


with IC 32-31-8-5(d), except as provided in section 7(a) of this
chapter, the enforcement authority shall immediately contract to
commence replacement or repair of the essential item not later
than twenty-four (24) hours after the inspection and is liable for
costs of the replacement or repair of an essential item in
accordance with section 12 of this chapter. In addition, the
enforcement authority may issue to the landlord a civil penalty not
to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). A civil penalty issued under
this section must be deposited in a fund established under
subsection (b).
(b) The enforcement authority shall establish in its operating
budget a fund designated as the residential rental unit repair fund.
Any balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried
over in the fund for the following year and does not revert to the
general fund. Civil penalties collected under subsection (a) shall be
deposited in the fund. The fund may be used for the expenses
incurred in carrying out the purposes of this section, including:
(1) the cost of obtaining reliable information about the
identity and location of each person who owns a substantial
property interest in unsafe premises;
(2) the cost of making repairs or the bid price of a contractor
to make the repairs;
(3) administrative costs to carry out this section; and
(4) costs associated with conducting a hearing under section
7 of this chapter.
SECTION 7. IC 36-7-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.247-2015,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A hearing must be held relative to each
order of the enforcement authority, except for an order issued under
section 5(a)(2), 5(a)(3), 5(a)(4), 5(a)(5), 5(a)(9), or 7.5 of this chapter.
An order issued under section 5(a)(2), 5(a)(3), 5(a)(4), 5(a)(5), or 7.5
of this chapter becomes final ten (10) days after notice is given, unless
a hearing is requested before the ten (10) day period ends by a person
holding a fee interest, life estate interest, mortgage interest, or equitable
interest of a contract purchaser in the unsafe premises. The hearing
shall be conducted by the hearing authority. A landlord may request
a hearing for an order issued under section 5(a)(9) of this chapter
before the enforcement authority commences to make a
replacement or repair of an essential item (as defined in
IC 32-31-8-5(a)) in accordance with section 5.5 of this chapter. If
a landlord requests a hearing pertaining to the enforcement of
section 5.5 of this chapter, the enforcement authority may not
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


commence with the replacement or repair of an essential item until
the hearing authority issues findings under this section.
(b) The hearing shall be held on a business day no earlier than ten
(10) days after notice of the order is given. The hearing authority may,
however, take action at the hearing, or before the hearing if a written
request is received by the enforcement authority not later than five (5)
days after notice is given, to continue the hearing to a business day not
later than fourteen (14) days after the hearing date shown on the order.
Unless the hearing authority takes action to have the continued hearing
held on a definite, specified date, notice of the continued hearing must
be given to the person to whom the order was issued at least five (5)
days before the continued hearing date, in the manner prescribed by
section 25 of this chapter. If the order being considered at the
continued hearing was served by publication, it is sufficient to give
notice of the continued hearing by publication unless the enforcement
authority has received information in writing that enables it to make
service under section 25 of this chapter by a method other than
publication.
(c) The person to whom the order was issued, any person having a
substantial property interest in the unsafe premises that are the subject
of the order, or any other person with an interest in the proceedings
may appear in person or by counsel at the hearing. Each person
appearing at the hearing is entitled to present evidence, cross-examine
opposing witnesses, and present arguments.
(d) At the conclusion of any hearing at which a continuance is not
granted, the hearing authority may make findings and take action to:
(1) affirm the order;
(2) rescind the order; or
(3) modify the order, but unless the person to whom the order was
issued, or counsel for that person, is present at the hearing, the
hearing authority may modify the order in only a manner that
makes its terms less stringent.
(e) In addition to affirming the order, in those cases in which the
hearing authority finds that there has been a willful failure to comply
with the order, the hearing authority may impose a civil penalty in an
amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The effective date
of the civil penalty may be postponed for a reasonable period, after
which the hearing authority may order the civil penalty reduced or
stricken if the hearing authority is satisfied that all work necessary to
fully comply with the order has been done. For purposes of an appeal
under section 8 of this chapter or enforcement of an order under section
17 of this chapter, action of the hearing authority is considered final
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


upon the affirmation of the order, even though the hearing authority
may retain jurisdiction for the ultimate determination related to the
civil penalty. In the hearing authority's exercise of continuing
jurisdiction, the hearing authority may, in addition to reducing or
striking the civil penalty, impose one (1) or more additional civil
penalties in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per
civil penalty. An additional civil penalty may be imposed if the hearing
authority finds that:
(1) significant work on the premises to comply with the affirmed
order has not been accomplished; and
(2) the premises have a negative effect on property values or the
quality of life of the surrounding area or the premises require the
provision of services by local government in excess of the
services required by ordinary properties.
The hearing authority may not impose an additional civil penalty in a
hearing to review a civil penalty imposed by the enforcement authority
under section 7.5 of this chapter.
(f) If, at a hearing, a person to whom an order has been issued
requests an additional period to accomplish action required by the
order, and shows good cause for this request to be granted, the hearing
authority may grant the request. However, as a condition for allowing
the additional period, the hearing authority may require that the person
post a performance bond to be forfeited if the action required by the
order is not completed within the additional period.
(g) If an order is affirmed or modified, the hearing authority shall
issue a continuous enforcement order (as defined in section 2 of this
chapter).
(h) The board or commission having control over the department
shall, at a public hearing, after having given notice of the time and
place of the hearing by publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1, adopt
a schedule setting forth the maximum amount of performance bonds
applicable to various types of ordered action. The hearing authority
shall use this schedule to fix the amount of the performance bond
required under subsection (f).
(i) The record of the findings made and action taken by the hearing
authority at the hearing shall be available to the public upon request.
However, neither the enforcement authority nor the hearing authority
is required to give any person notice of the findings and action.
(j) If a civil penalty under subsection (e) is unpaid for more than
fifteen (15) days after payment of the civil penalty is due, the civil
penalty may be collected from any person against whom the hearing
officer assessed the civil penalty or fine. A civil penalty or fine may be
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116


collected under this subsection in the same manner as costs under
section 13 or 13.5 of this chapter. The amount of the civil penalty or
fine that is collected shall be deposited in the unsafe building fund.
SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1113—LS 6375/DI 116